test/src/gt-norm-yamls/possessive-endings_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst

Tests:

  Nouns with vowel endings:
    # nouns in -a
    cirya+N+PxSg1+Sing+Nom: ciryanya
    cirya+N+PxSg1+Sing+Gen: ciryanyo
    cirya+N+PxSg1+Plur+Nom: ciryanyar
    cirya+N+PxSg1+Plur+Par+Ins: ciryanyalínen
    cirya+N+PxSg3+Sing+Nom: ciryarya
    cirya+N+PxSg3+Sing+Gen: ciryaryo
    cirya+N+PxSg3+Plur+Nom: ciryaryar
    cirya+N+PxSg3+Plur+Par+Ins: ciryaryalínen
    # nouns in -e
    aiwë+N+PxSg1+Sing+Nom: aiwenya
    aiwë+N+PxSg1+Sing+Gen: aiwenyo
    aiwë+N+PxSg1+Plur+Nom: aiwenyar
    aiwë+N+PxSg1+Plur+Par+Ins: aiwenyalínen
    aiwë+N+PxSg3+Sing+Nom: aiwerya
    aiwë+N+PxSg3+Sing+Gen: aiweryo
    aiwë+N+PxSg3+Plur+Nom: aiweryar
    aiwë+N+PxSg3+Plur+Par+Ins: aiweryalínen
  
  Nouns with consonant endings:
    # -inya
    anar+N+PxSg1+Sing+Nom: anarinya
    anar+N+PxSg1+Sing+Gen: anarinyo
    anar+N+PxSg1+Plur+Nom: anarinyar
    anar+N+PxSg1+Plur+Par+Ins: anarinyalínen
    # -erya
    anar+N+PxSg3+Sing+Nom: anarerya
    anar+N+PxSg3+Sing+Gen: anareryo
    anar+N+PxSg3+Plur+Nom: anareryar
    anar+N+PxSg3+Plur+Par+Ins: anareryalínen
  
  Nouns with stem changes:
    # mid-stem
    nér+N+PxSg1+Sing+Nom: nerinya
    nér+N+PxSg1+Sing+Gen: nerinyo
    nér+N+PxSg1+Plur+Nom: nerinyar
    nér+N+PxSg1+Plur+Par+Ins: nerinyalínen
    nér+N+PxSg3+Sing+Nom: nererya
    nér+N+PxSg3+Sing+Gen: nereryo
    nér+N+PxSg3+Plur+Nom: nereryar
    nér+N+PxSg3+Plur+Par+Ins: nereryalínen
    # end of the stem vowel
    súrë+N+PxSg1+Sing+Nom: súrinya
    súrë+N+PxSg1+Sing+Gen: súrinyo
    súrë+N+PxSg1+Plur+Nom: súrinyar
    súrë+N+PxSg1+Plur+Par+Ins: súrinyalínen
    súrë+N+PxSg3+Sing+Nom: súrirya
    súrë+N+PxSg3+Sing+Gen: súriryo
    súrë+N+PxSg3+Plur+Nom: súriryar
    súrë+N+PxSg3+Plur+Par+Ins: súriryalínen
    # end of the stem consonant
    talan+N+PxSg1+Sing+Nom: talaminya
    talan+N+PxSg1+Sing+Gen: talaminyo
    talan+N+PxSg1+Plur+Nom: talaminyar
    talan+N+PxSg1+Plur+Par+Ins: talaminyalínen
    talan+N+PxSg3+Sing+Nom: talamerya
    talan+N+PxSg3+Sing+Gen: talameryo
    talan+N+PxSg3+Plur+Nom: talameryar
    talan+N+PxSg3+Plur+Par+Ins: talameryalínen
    # cu/qu
    ranco+N+PxSg1+Sing+Nom: rancunya
    ranco+N+PxSg1+Sing+Gen: rancunyo
    ranco+N+PxSg1+Plur+Nom: rancunyar
    ranco+N+PxSg1+Plur+Par+Ins: rancunyalínen
    ranco+N+PxSg3+Sing+Nom: rancurya
    ranco+N+PxSg3+Sing+Gen: rancuryo
    ranco+N+PxSg3+Plur+Nom: rancuryar
    ranco+N+PxSg3+Plur+Par+Ins: rancuryalínen
    # gu/gw
    ango+N+PxSg1+Sing+Nom: angunya
    ango+N+PxSg1+Sing+Gen: angunyo
    ango+N+PxSg1+Plur+Nom: angunyar
    ango+N+PxSg1+Plur+Par+Ins: angunyalínen
    ango+N+PxSg3+Sing+Nom: angurya
    ango+N+PxSg3+Sing+Gen: anguryo
    ango+N+PxSg3+Plur+Nom: anguryar
    ango+N+PxSg3+Plur+Par+Ins: anguryalínen
